Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Nonjudicial Dissolution

48-245-201. Nonjudicial termination by organizers.

Manner. An LLC that has not accepted contributions may be dissolved and terminated by the organizers in the manner set forth in this section.

Articles of Termination. A majority of the organizers shall sign and file with the secretary of state articles of termination containing:

The name of the LLC;

The date of organization;

A statement that contributions have not been accepted; and

A statement that no debts remain unpaid.

The secretary of state shall file the articles of termination of existence of the LLC if the secretary of state finds that the articles:

Comply with subsection (b); and

Are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such LLC.

When the articles of termination have been filed in accordance with subsection (c), the existence of the LLC is terminated.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2009, ch. 349, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 741, § 26.

48-245-202. Nonjudicial dissolution by members.

Manner. An LLC may be dissolved by the members:

Upon any event of dissolution set forth in the articles, operating agreement, or the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act, compiled in chapters 201-248 of this title, requiring member action;

By any procedures set forth in the articles or operating agreement; or

By the members when authorized in the manner set forth in this section.

Notice and Approval.

The proposed dissolution must be submitted for approval at a meeting of members. Written notice shall be given to each member, whether or not entitled to vote at a meeting of members, within the time and in the manner provided in § 48-222-101 for meetings of members, and whether the meeting is a regular or a special meeting, must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider dissolving the LLC and that dissolution must be followed by the winding up and termination of the LLC.

If the proposed dissolution is approved at a meeting by a majority vote or such greater vote as may be provided for in the articles or operating agreement, the LLC must be dissolved and notice of dissolution shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state pursuant to § 48-245-401.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 80; 1999, ch. 455, § 32.